Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 147A.01, subdivision 18, is amended to read: Subd. 18. Physician deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin associatenew text end or licensed physician deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin associatenew text end . "Physician deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin associatenew text end " or "licensed physician deleted text begin assistantdeleted text end new text begin associatenew text end " means a person licensed pursuant to this chapter who meets the qualifications in section 147A.02. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 147A.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Protected titles. No individual may use the titlesnew text begin "Minnesota Licensed Physician Associate," "Licensed Physician Associate," "Physician Associate,"new text end "Minnesota Licensed Physician Assistant," "Licensed Physician Assistant," "Physician Assistant," or "PA" in connection with the individual's name, or any other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying that the individual is licensed by the state unless they have been licensed according to this chapter. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 147A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Title revision. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a physician assistant must be titled a "physician associate" in Minnesota Statutes and Minnesota Rules. The terms "physician associate," "physician assistant," and "PA" are synonymous, and all rights and responsibilities of a physician assistant in Minnesota Statutes must continue uninterrupted and unchanged. new text end new text begin (b) The title change to "physician associate" under paragraph (a) does not expand the scope of practice for a professional licensed under this chapter. new text end new text begin (c) All persons or entities employing, coordinating treatment with, following orders from, training, educating, or contracting with an individual licensed as a physician associate under this chapter or educating an individual enrolled in an accredited physician assistant or physician associate educational program shall continue this relationship without interruption or alteration as a result of the title change under paragraph (a). No person or entity shall discriminate against any individual in contract, employment, or otherwise solely as a result of an individual's change of title described in paragraph (a). This paragraph applies to persons and entities that include but are not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) hospitals or other health care facilities; new text end new text begin (2) physicians; new text end new text begin (3) malpractice insurance carriers; new text end new text begin (4) the federal government; and new text end new text begin (5) third-party payors, including but not limited to commercial insurers, health maintenance organizations, and the Minnesota medical assistance program. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONERS AND BOARDS.new text end new text begin The commissioners of health and human services, and health-related licensing boards, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 214.01, subdivision 2, if applicable, must, as soon as practicable in the normal course of business, make conforming amendments to active versions of commissioner or board guidance, documents, and forms within their jurisdiction reflecting the change of title described in Minnesota Statutes, section 147A.03, subdivision 5. The commissioners and boards may take all further action necessary to reflect the change of title described in Minnesota Statutes, section 147A.03, subdivision 5. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes shall change the term "physician assistant" and applicable variants to "physician associate" and applicable variants wherever the term appears in Minnesota Statutes and Minnesota Rules. The revisor may make grammatical and conforming changes related to the term change. new text end